District of Columbia statutes.
31-4428

Limitation of payments to stockholders and policyholders.

No domestic company shall make any payments in form of dividends or otherwise to its stockholders for or on account of any interest in or relation to the company as stockholders unless it possesses assets in the amount of such payment in excess of its liabilities, including its capital stock, and the surplus required by this subdivision; and no domestic company shall make any payments to its policyholders for or on account of any interest in or relation to the company as members or policyholders except for matured claims or other policy obligations and in the purchase of surrender values unless it possesses assets in the amount of such payments in excess of its liabilities, and the capital stock and surplus required by this subdivision.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1151, ch. 672, ch. III, § 28

History

1981 Ed., § 35-628.
1973 Ed., § 35-528.

Prior Codifications